en: Thai rice, jasmine rice
bg: ориз жасмин, тайландски ориз
cs: jasmínová rýže
de: Thai-Reis, Jasmin-Reis
es: Arroz jazmín, Arroz tailandes
fi: Jasmiiniriisi
fr: riz thaï, riz jasmin, riz au jasmin, riz parfumé, riz parfume de thailande, riz au jasmin thai, Riz thaï au jasmin
hr: tajlandska riža
hu: jázminrizs, jázmin rizs
it: riso tailandese, di riso tailandese, riso algelsomino
nl: thaise rijst, jasmijnrijst
sv: Jasminris

fr: riz blanc thailandais
fi: valkoinen jasmiiniriisi

en: black Thai rice
cs: černá rýže
de: Thailändischer schwarzer Naturreis, Thailändischer schwarzer Reis, Thailändischer schwarzer Klebreis
fr: thai riz noir
hr: crna tajlandska riža
hu: fekete jázminrizs, fekete jázmin rizs
it: riso nero thailandese

en: Thai long grain rice
de: Langkorn Thai-Reis
es: Arroz de grano largo Thai
fi: pitkäjyväinen jasmiiniriisi
fr: riz thai long grain, riz long grain thai, riz long thai, Riz long grain de Thailande
hr: tajlandska riža dugog zrna
hu: hosszú szemű jázminrizs, hosszú szemű jázmin rizs
it: riso tailandese a grani lunghi
nl: Langkorrelige Thaise rijst
sv: långkornigt jasminris

en: Hom Mali rice, thai hom mali rice
de: Hom Mali
fr: riz thaï Hom Mali, Hom Mali
hr: hom mali riža
it: riso Hom Mali
nl: Hom Mali
sv: thai hom mali

en: organic Thai long grain white rice
fi: luomu pitkäjyväinen valkoinen jasmiiniriisi
fr: riz-blanc-thailandais-a-grains-longs-issu-de-l-agriculture-biologique
hr: organska tajlandska bijela riža dugog zrna
it: riso bianco tailandese a grani lunghi biologico

en: semi-whole thai rice
fr: riz thaï semi-complet

en: Thaï brown rice
de: Thai-Naturreis
fi: tumma jasmiiniriisi
fr: Riz thaï complet, riz complet thaï
hr: tajlandska smeđa riža
it: riso integrale tailandese

fr: Riz thaï long grain de qualité supérieure
de: qualitativ hochwertiger thailändischer Langkornreis
nl: Thaise langkorrelrijst van hoge kwaliteit

en: Camargue rice
de: Reis aus der Camargue
fi: camargue-riisi
fr: riz de Camargue
hr: camargue riža
hu: Camargue rizs, Camargue-i rizs
it: riso Camargue

en: superior quality Camargue long grain rice
de: Camargue Premiumqualität Langkornreis
fr: Riz de Camargue long grain de qualité supérieure
hr: riža dugog zrna camargue vrhunske kvalitete
it: riso Camargue a grani lunghi di qualità superiore

en: Camargue long grain white rice
de: Camarguischer weißer Langkornreis
fi: pitkäjyväinen valkoinen camargue-riisi
fr: riz de Camargue long blanc
hr: camargue bijela riža dugog zrna
it: riso bianco a grani lunghi Camargue

en: Camargue whole long grain rice
de: Langkorn Naturreis aus der Camargue
fi: pitkäjyväinen camargue-täysjyväriisi
fr: riz de Camargue long complet
hr: camargue riža cijelog dugog zrna
it: riso integrale a grani lunghi Camargue

en: Camargue whole long grain black rice
de: schwarzer Langkorn Naturreis aus der Camargue
fr: Riz de Camargue noir long complet
hr: camargue crna riža cijelog dugog zrna
it: riso nero integrale a grani lunghi Camargue

en: Arborio rice
bg: Ориз Арборио
de: Arborioreis, Arborio-Reis
fi: arborio-riisi
fr: riz arborio
hr: arborio riža
hu: Arborio rizs
it: Riso Arborio

en: carnaroli rice
de: Carnaroli Reis
fi: carnaroli riisi
fr: riz Carnaroli
hr: carnaroli riža
hu: carnaroli rizs
it: riso carnaroli
ja: カルナローリ
ko: 카르나롤리
nl: Carnarolirijst
ru: Карнароли

en: rice cream
de: Reiscreme
es: crema de arroz
hr: krema od riže
it: crema di riso
pt: creme de arroz

en: rice bran
da: risklid
de: Reiskleie
el: πίτυρο ρυζιού
es: salvado de arroz
fi: riisilese
fr: son de riz
hr: zrno riže
it: crusca di riso
ja: 米ぬか
ko: 쌀겨
nl: rijstzemelen
pt: farelo de arroz
sv: riskli
zh: 米糠

en: rice semolina
de: Reisgriess, Reisgrieß
es: sémola de arroz
fi: riisisuurimo
fr: semoule de riz
hr: rižin griz
hu: rizsdara
it: semolino di riso
pt: sêmola de arroz

en: rice flakes
de: Reisflocken
es: copos de arroz
fi: riisihiutale
fr: flocons de riz
hr: rižine pahuljice
it: fiocchi di riso
ja: ライスフレーク
pl: płatki ryżowe
pt: flocos de arroz